Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8023.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-3 of the General Laws entitled "Property Subject to Taxation" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-3-70. Johnston -- Certain tax exemptions.
(a) The town council of the town of Johnston is hereby authorized, by ordinance or
resolution, to exempt from taxation a specified dollar amount of real and/or personal property of
qualified individuals as defined in §§ 44-3-4 and 44-3-5, who are residents of the town of Johnston
and are:
(1) Veterans of war;
(2) Unmarried spouses of veterans of war;
(3) Veterans or the unmarried widow or widower of veterans who are one hundred percent
(100%) disabled through a service-connected disability;
(4) Persons who are one hundred percent (100%) disabled as determined pursuant to title
II and title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq., and 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.,
or who, by reason of their being one hundred percent (100%) disabled, are receiving disability
payments from sources other than the social security administration (such as employees of the
railroad, federal civil service, postal service, and the Johnston police and fire departments or any
person receiving federal disability retirement);
(5) Persons who are blind as provided in § 44-3-12;
(6) Gold star parents as provided in § 44-3-5;

(7) Veterans who were prisoners of war;
(8) Any person sixty-five (65) years of age, or over;
(9) Any person sixty-two (62) through sixty-four (64) years of age, who is receiving social
security benefits;
(10) Using the exemption for specially adapted housing for veterans with paraplegia as
defined in § 44-3-4.
(b) The town council of the town of Johnston may subject the exemptions provided in this
section to verifications with respect to qualification for exemptions that it deems necessary or
desirable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005487
========
LC005487 - Page 2 of 3